Utah statutes.
75-7-702.   Trustee's bond.
(1)  A trustee shall give bond to secure performance of the trustee's duties
only if the court finds that a bond is needed to protect the interests of the
beneficiaries or is required by the terms of the trust and the court has not
dispensed with the requirement.
(2)  The court may specify the amount of a bond, its liabilities, and whether
sureties are necessary.  The court may modify or terminate a bond at any time.
(3)  A regulated financial service institution qualified to do trust business
in this state need not give bond, unless required by the terms of the trust.
The cost of any bond shall be borne by the trust.
(4)  Unless otherwise directed by the court, the cost of the bond is charged
to the trust.
